Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.046

Reservation of exclusive right to use corporate name.

The exclusive right to the use of a corporate name may be reserved in accordance with RCW 23.95.310.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4104; 1993 c 356 s 13; 1982 c 35 s 122.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 356: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 356 s 25.]

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.